District of Columbia statutes.
5-411

Extra equipment authorized for volunteer fire organization.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to install under such rules and regulations as the Council of the District of Columbia may prescribe, in any suburb of the said District, such extra apparatus and appliances belonging to the Fire Department of the District of Columbia as may, in his opinion, be available for the use of any volunteer fire organization which may be created in such suburb; and such apparatus and appliances shall be maintained in proper condition for service by the purchase of the necessary supplies out of the appropriations provided for the Fire Department of the District of Columbia.

May 26, 1908, 35 Stat. 298, ch. 198
1981 Ed., § 4-311.
1973 Ed., § 4-411.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(109) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.